Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB633.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 367.3611 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 367.3611 to 367.3629:
(1) "Affiliate" means a legal entity that controls, is controlled by, or is under common
control with another legal entity or shares common branding with another legal
entity. As used in this subsection[For the purposes of this definition], "control" or
"controlled" means:
(a) Ownership of, or the power to vote, more than fifty percent (50%) of the
outstanding shares of any class of voting security of a company;
(b) Control in any manner over the election of a majority of the directors or of
individuals exercising similar functions; or
(c) The power to exercise controlling influence over the management of a
company;
(2) "Algorithmic feed" means a media display system of an online service, product,
or feature that delivers a stream or list of media using automated rules to select,
order, rank, or prioritize the media based on a user's personal data;
(3) "Algorithmic recommendation system":
(a) Means a computational process used to select, order, rank, or prioritize
media provided to a user through an online service, product, or feature,
including but not limited to search results, ranking, recommendations,
display, or any other method of automated selection; and
(b) Does not include a computational process that:
1. Enables users to find other specific users on a covered business's
service, such as by entering individual information as a search query
or uploading a list of contacts; or
2. Returns media responsive to a user's search query, provided the
Page 1 of 20
XXXX 2/11/2026 7:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 356
system does not:
a. Process other personal data of the user to determine the
selection, order, rank, or priority of the media; or
b. Associate the search query with the user after the search results
are returned;
(4) "Authenticate" means verifying through reasonable means that the consumer
entitled to exercise his or her consumer rights in KRS 367.3615 is the same
consumer exercising such consumer rights with respect to the personal data at issue;
(5)[(3)] "Biometric data":
(a) Means data generated by automatic measurements of an individual's
biological characteristics, such as a fingerprint, voiceprint, eye retinas, irises,
or other unique biological patterns or characteristics that are used to identify a
specific individual; and[.]
(b) [Biometric data ]Does not include a physical or digital photograph, a video or
audio recording, or data generated therefrom, unless that data is generated to
identify a specific individual or information collected, used, or stored for
health care treatment, payment, or operations under HIPAA;
(6)[(4)] "Business associate" has the same meaning as established in 45 C.F.R. sec.
160.103 pursuant to HIPAA;
(7)[(5)] "Child" means an individual under the age of thirteen (13) years[has the
same meaning as in 15 U.S.C. sec. 6501];
(8)[(6)] "Consent":
(a) Means a clear affirmative act signifying a consumer's freely given, specific,
informed, and unambiguous agreement to process personal data relating to the
consumer; and[.]
(b) [Consent ]May include a written statement, written by electronic means or any
other unambiguous affirmative action;
Page 2 of 20
XXXX 2/11/2026 7:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 356
(9)[(7)] "Consumer":
(a) Means a natural person who is a resident of the Commonwealth of Kentucky
acting only in an individual context; and[.]
(b) [Consumer ]Does not include a natural person acting in a commercial or
employment context;
(10)[(8)] "Controller" means the natural or legal person that, alone or jointly with
others, determines the purpose and means of processing personal data;
(11) "Covered design feature" means any feature that:
(a) Continuously loads new media in an algorithmic feed seamlessly and absent
a specific request from the user in an infinite scroll feed;
(b) Uses intermittent, variable reward schedules; or
(c) Automatically plays a video, unless the video is the next in a series and user
expressly and unambiguously chose to play a prior video in the series;
(12)[(9)] "Covered entity" has the same meaning as established in 45 C.F.R. sec.
160.103 pursuant to HIPAA;
(13) "Covered minor" means a user that a covered online service knows or should
have known, based on objective knowledge or circumstances, to be a minor;
(14) "Covered online service" means a person that owns, operates, controls, or
provides an online service that:
(a) Conducts business in this state;
(b) Alone, or jointly with its affiliates, subsidiaries, or parent companies,
determines the purposes and means of processing of consumers' personal
data; and
(c) Annually processes, buys, receives, sells, or shares the personal data of one
hundred thousand (100,000) or more consumers, or derives at least fifty
percent (50%) of its annual gross revenue from the sale or sharing of
personal data;
Page 3 of 20
XXXX 2/11/2026 7:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 356
(15) "Dark pattern":
(a) Means a user interface designed or manipulated with the effect of
substantially subverting or impairing user autonomy, decision making, or
choice; and
(b) Includes any practice determined to be an unfair or deceptive act or practice
by the Federal Trade Commission under 15 U.S.C. sec. 45, as of January 1,
2024;
(16)[(10)] "Decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning a
consumer" means a decision made by a controller that results in the provision or
denial by the controller of financial and lending services, housing, insurance,
education enrollment, criminal justice, employment opportunities, health care
services, or access to basic necessities like food and water;
(17) "Default" means a preselected option adopted by the covered business for an
online service, product, or feature;
(18)[(11)] "De-identified data" means data that cannot reasonably be linked to an
identified or identifiable natural person or a device linked to a person;
(19)[(12)] "Fund" means the consumer privacy fund established in KRS 367.3629;
(20)[(13)] "Health care provider" means:
(a) Any health facility as defined in KRS 216B.015;
(b) Any person or entity providing health care or health services, including those
licensed, certified, or registered under, or subject to, KRS 194A.700 to
194A.729 or KRS Chapter 310, 311, 311A, 311B, 312, 313, 314, 314A, 315,
319, 319A, 319B, 319C, 320, 327, 333, 334A, or 335;
(c) The current and former employers, officers, directors, administrators, agents,
or employees of those entities listed in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this
subsection; or
(d) Any person acting within the course and scope of his or her office,
Page 4 of 20
XXXX 2/11/2026 7:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 356
employment, or agency relating to a health care provider;
(21)[(14)] "Health record" means a record, other than for financial or billing purposes,
relating to an individual, kept by a health care provider as a result of the
professional relationship established between the health care provider and the
individual;
(22)[(15)] "HIPAA" means the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability
Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-191;
(23)[(16)] "Identified or identifiable natural person" means a person who can be readily
identified directly or indirectly;
(24)[(17)] "Institution of higher education" means an educational institution which:
(a) Admits as regular students only individuals having a certificate of graduation
from a high school or the recognized equivalent of such a certificate;
(b) Is legally authorized in this state to provide a program of education beyond
high school;
(c) Provides an educational program for which it awards a bachelor's or higher
degree, or provides a program which is acceptable for full credit toward such
a degree, a program of postgraduate or postdoctoral studies, or a program of
training to prepare students for gainful employment in a recognized
occupation; and
(d) Is a public or other nonprofit institution;
(25) (a) "Knows to be a child" or "knows to be a minor" means having actual
knowledge that a user is a child or minor, as applicable.
(b) As used in this subsection, "actual knowledge" means all information and
inferences known to a covered online service relating to the age of an
individual, including but not limited to self-identified age and any age the
covered online service has attributed to or associated with the individual for
any purpose, including marketing, advertising, or product development. If a
Page 5 of 20
XXXX 2/11/2026 7:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 356
covered online service's classification of an individual for purposes of
marketing or advertising is inconsistent with the individual's self-identified
age, a covered online service shall disregard self-identified age for purposes
of KRS 367.3611 to 367.3629;
(26) "Media" means text, an image, a video, or an audio recording;
(27) "Minor" means an individual under the age of eighteen (18) years;
(28)[(18)] "Nonprofit organization" means any incorporated or unincorporated entity
that:
(a) Is operating for religious, charitable, or educational purposes; and
(b) Does not provide net earnings to, or operate in any manner that inures to the
benefit of, any officer, employee, or shareholder of the entity;
(29) "Online service":
(a) Means any service, product, or feature that is accessible to the public via the
internet, including a website or application; and
(b) Does not include:
1. A telecommunications service as defined in 47 U.S.C. sec. 153;
2. A broadband internet access service as defined in 47 C.F.R. sec. 8.1;
or
3. The sale, delivery, or use of a physical device;
(30) "Parent" includes legal guardian;
(31)[(19)] "Personal data":
(a) Means any information that is linked or reasonably linkable to an identified or
identifiable natural person; and[.]
(b) [Personal data ]Does not include de-identified data or publicly available
information;
(32)[(20)] "Precise geolocation data":
(a) Means information derived from technology, including but not limited to
Page 6 of 20
XXXX 2/11/2026 7:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 356
global positioning system level latitude and longitude coordinates or other
mechanisms, that directly identifies the specific location of a natural person
with precision and accuracy within a radius of one thousand seven hundred
fifty (1,750) feet; and[.]
(b) [Precise geolocation data ]Does not include the content of communications or
any data generated by or connected to advanced utility metering infrastructure
systems or equipment for use by a utility;
(33)[(21)] "Process" or "processing" means any operation or set of operations performed,
whether by manual or automated means, on personal data or on sets of personal
data, including but not limited to the collection, use, storage, disclosure, analysis,
deletion, or modification of personal data;
(34)[(22)] "Processor" means a natural or legal entity that processes personal data on
behalf of a controller;
(35)[(23)] "Profiling" means any form of automated processing performed on personal
data to evaluate, analyze, or predict personal aspects related to an identified or
identifiable natural person's economic situation, health, personal preferences,
interests, reliability, behavior, location, or movements;
(36)[(24)] "Protected health information" has the same meaning[means the same] as
established in 45 C.F.R. sec. 160.103 pursuant to HIPAA;
(37)[(25)] "Pseudonymous data" means personal data that cannot be attributed to a
specific natural person without the use of additional information, provided that the
additional information is kept separately and is subject to appropriate technical and
organizational measures to ensure that the personal data is not attributed to an
identified or identifiable natural person;
(38)[(26)] "Publicly available information":
(a) Means information that is lawfully made available through federal, state, or
local government records, or information that a business has a reasonable
Page 7 of 20
XXXX 2/11/2026 7:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 356
basis to believe is lawfully made available to the general public through
widely distributed media, by the consumer, or by a person to whom the
consumer has disclosed the information, unless the consumer has restricted
the information to a specific audience; and
(b) Does not mean biometric data collected by a covered online service about a
covered minor without the covered minor's knowledge;
(39)[(27)] "Sale of personal data":
(a) Means the exchange of personal data for monetary consideration by the
controller to a third party; and[.]
(b) [Sale of personal data ]Does not include:
1.[(a)] The disclosure of personal data to a processor that processes the
personal data on behalf of the controller;
2.[(b)] The disclosure of personal data to a third party for purposes of
providing a product or service requested by the consumer;
3.[(c)] The disclosure or transfer of personal data to an affiliate of the
controller;
4.[(d)] The disclosure of information that the consumer:
a.[1.] Intentionally made available to the general public via a channel of
mass media; and
b.[2.] Did not restrict to a specific audience; or
5.[(e)] The disclosure or transfer of personal data to a third party as an
asset that is part of a proposed or actual merger, acquisition, bankruptcy,
or other transaction in which the third party assumes control of all or
part of the controller's assets;
(40)[(28)] "Sensitive data" means a category of personal data that includes:
(a) Personal data indicating racial or ethnic origin, religious beliefs, mental or
physical health diagnosis, sexual orientation, or citizenship or immigration
Page 8 of 20
XXXX 2/11/2026 7:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 356
status;
(b) The processing of genetic or biometric data that is processed for the purpose
of uniquely identifying a specific natural person;
(c) The personal data collected from a known child; or
(d) Precise geolocation data;
(41)[(29)] "State agency" means all departments, offices, commissions, boards,
institutions, and political and corporate bodies of the state, including the offices of
the clerk of the Supreme Court, clerks of the appellate courts, the several courts of
the state, and the legislature, its committees, or commissions;
(42)[(30)] "Targeted advertising":
(a) Means displaying advertisements to a consumer where the advertisement is
selected based on personal data obtained or inferred from that consumer's
activities over time and across nonaffiliated websites or online applications to
predict that consumer's preferences or interests; and[.]
(b) ["Targeted advertising" ]Does not include:
1.[(a)] Advertisements based on activities within a controller's own or
affiliated websites or online applications;
2.[(b)] Advertisements based on the context of a consumer's current
search query, visit to a website, or online application;
3.[(c)] Advertisements directed to a consumer in response to the
consumer's request for information or feedback; or
4.[(d)] Processing personal data solely for measuring or reporting
advertising performance, reach, or frequency;
(43)[(31)] "Third party" means a natural or legal person, public authority, agency, or
body other than the consumer, controller, processor, or an affiliate of the processor
or the controller;[ and]
(44)[(32)] "Trade secret" has the same meaning as in KRS 365.880; and
Page 9 of 20
XXXX 2/11/2026 7:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 356
(45) "User" means an individual who registers an account or creates a profile on a
covered online service.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 367.3611 TO 367.3629 IS
CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A covered online service shall:
(a) Configure all default privacy settings provided to a covered minor through
its online service, product, or feature to the highest level of privacy;
(b) Provide covered minors with settings to enable or disable each specific
category of push notification offered by the covered online service on the
product or service, including but not limited to marketing notifications,
direct message notifications, media interaction notifications, and any other
category of notification pushed by the product or service;
(c) Disable by default all interaction counts, including but not limited to counts
of reactions and comments on all of the covered minor’s media;
(d) Offer settings to enable or disable specific types of interaction counts,
including but not limited to comments, reactions, reshares, or other
categories of interactions; and
(e) Offer a single setting to turn on all interaction counts only if the settings to
turn on specific interactions are equally prominent and accessible.
(2) A covered online service shall:
(a) Provide a prominent and accessible tool to allow:
1. A covered minor to request the covered online service delete any:
a. Account profiles;
b. Media and personal data provided by or obtained about the
consumer, including personal data the consumer provided to the
covered online service;
c. Personal data the covered online service obtained from another
Page 10 of 20
XXXX 2/11/2026 7:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 356
source; and
d. Derived data; or
2. The parent of a covered minor to make such a request on the child’s
behalf;
(b) Comply with a request under paragraph (a) of this subsection not later than
fifteen (15) days after a covered online service receives the request;
(c) Provide each covered minor with accessible and user-friendly tools that:
1. Allow a covered minor to opt out of the use of the covered minor's
personal data to select, recommend, or prioritize media for the covered
minor in an algorithmic feed, except when that personal data is:
a. The covered minor's express and unambiguous request to
receive:
i. Media from a specific account, feed, or user, or to receive
more or less media from that account, feed, or user;
ii. A specific category of media, including but not limited to
"breaking news" or to see more or less of that category of
media; or
iii. More or less media with similar characteristics as the
media they are currently viewing;
b. User-selected privacy or accessibility settings;
c. The covered minor’s location, but only to determine whether the
covered minor is within the Commonwealth for purposes of
complying with this section;
d. The consumer’s age, but only to implement the covered
business’s policies regarding media appropriate for minors; or
e. A search query, provided the search query is only used to select
and prioritize media in response to the search;
Page 11 of 20
XXXX 2/11/2026 7:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 356
2. Control the use of in-game purchases or other transactions by
allowing a covered minor to opt out of all purchases and transactions
or to place limits on purchases and transactions;
3. Limit the amount of time the covered minor spends on the covered
online service; and
4. Notify a covered minor of a covered design feature when any of the
tools described in this section are in effect, and describe what settings
have been applied;
(d) Establish default settings for the safeguards required in paragraph (c) of
this subsection at the option or level that provides the highest protection
available for the safety of the covered minor;
(e) Collect and use only the minimum amount of a covered minor's personal
data necessary to provide the specific elements of an online service with
which the covered minor has knowingly engaged, and ensure that the
collected personal data is not used for reasons other than those for which it
was collected;
(f) Retain the personal data of a covered minor only as long as necessary to
provide the specific elements of an online service with which the covered
minor has knowingly engaged;
(g) Provide an obvious sign to a covered minor when precise geolocation
information is being collected or used;
(h) If the covered online service allows parental monitoring, provide an obvious
signal to a covered minor when the minor is being monitored;
(i) Provide parents the ability to do the following for an individual the covered
online service knows to be a child:
1. Manage the child's privacy and account settings in a manner that
allows parents to:
Page 12 of 20
XXXX 2/11/2026 7:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 356
a. View the child's privacy and account settings; and
b. Change and control the child's privacy and account settings;
2. Restrict purchases and financial transactions of the child;
3. Enable parents to view the total time the child has spent on a covered
online service, and place reasonable limits on the child's use of the
covered online service; and
4. Restrict the child's use of the covered online service during times of
day specified by the parents, including during school hours and at
night; and
(j) Establish mechanisms for covered minors and parents to report harms on
covered online services.
(3) A covered online service shall not, by default, configure its online product,
service, or feature to:
(a) Use an algorithmic recommendation system to recommend to any known
adult user that they connect to a covered minor as a friend, follower, or
contact;
(b) Use an algorithmic recommendation system to recommend to any known
adult user that they follow a covered minor’s media, unless the covered
minor’s account was connected to the known adult’s account as a friend,
follower, or contact prior to the recommendation;
(c) Use an algorithmic recommendation system to recommend to any known
adult user that they communicate with a covered minor through direct
messaging, unless the covered minor’s account was connected to the known
adult’s account as a friend, follower, or contact prior to the
recommendation;
(d) Use an algorithmic recommendation system to recommend to a covered
minor that they communicate with any known adult through direct
Page 13 of 20
XXXX 2/11/2026 7:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 356
messaging, unless the covered minor’s account was connected to the known
adult’s account as a friend, follower, or contact prior to the
recommendation;
(e) Display a covered minor’s friends, followers, or contacts;
(f) Enable search engine indexing of a covered minor’s account profile and
media;
(g) Display the location of any covered minor to any other user unless the
covered minor has expressly and unambiguously chosen to share his or her
location with the specific user;
(h) Send push notifications to any covered minor; or
(i) Provide a single setting that enables all push notifications.
(4) (a) A covered online service that facilitates communications between users
shall provide a prominent, accessible, and responsive tool that gives a
covered minor the option to block specific users from taking each of the
following actions:
1. Accessing the user’s media;
2. Interacting with the user’s media;
3. Communicating with the user through their media;
4. Communicating with the user through direct messaging; and
5. Communicating with the user through any other means offered by the
covered online service through the product or service.
(b) The tool described in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall provide a
covered minor with the option to prevent media from the blocked user from
appearing in the covered minor’s feed.
(c) The tool described in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall, at a minimum,
be accessible from a feature located:
1. Proximate to every instance of another user’s username, avatar, or
Page 14 of 20
XXXX 2/11/2026 7:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 356
both;
2. On all media shared by another user;
3. On every direct message or direct message thread; and
4. In a first-level settings menu labeled "blocked users."
(d) The features described in paragraph (c)1. to 3. of this subsection shall
provide a covered minor with the option to:
1. Block the other user, which will trigger all of the settings in
paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection; or
2. Go to the settings page to select more granular block settings for the
other user.
(5) A covered online service that offers an algorithmic feed to a covered minor that
uses the covered minor’s personal data to select, recommend, or prioritize media
in the feed shall:
(a) Provide a prominent and accessible user interface that enables the covered
minor to:
1. Expressly and unambiguously communicate his or her preferences
about the types of media to be recommended and to be blocked in the
output of the relevant algorithmic recommendation system; and
2. Access, review, and make changes to any personal data the covered
online service uses to determine the output of the relevant algorithmic
recommendation system;
(b) Ensure that the relevant algorithmic recommendation system is informed by
these preferences; and
(c) Provide the minor with the choice of an algorithmic feed that only selects
media from sources the minor affirmatively chose to follow or otherwise
include in the feed.
(6) A covered online service shall not:
Page 15 of 20
XXXX 2/11/2026 7:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 356
(a) Profile a covered minor unless profiling is necessary to provide a covered
online service requested by a covered minor, and only with respect to the
aspects of the covered online service with which the covered minor is
actively and knowingly engaged;
(b) Facilitate advertising of prohibited products, including but not limited to
narcotic drugs, tobacco products, gambling, and alcohol, to covered minors;
(c) Facilitate targeted advertising to a covered minor;
(d) Use dark patterns directed at a covered minor;
(e) Be required to collect the personal data of a user to comply with this section.
A covered online service that collects personal data of a user for age
verification shall not use personal data for other purposes and shall delete
personal data after use for age verification;
(f) Provide a covered minor with a single setting that makes more than one (1)
default privacy or design feature setting less protective at once;
(g) Request or prompt a covered minor to make any of the settings less
protective, unless the change is strictly necessary for the covered minor to
access a service or feature that the minor has expressly and unambiguously
requested; or
(h) Use notifications and push alerts to a covered minor between the hours of
10 p.m. and 6 a.m., and between the hours of 8 a.m. and 4 p.m. on weekdays
from August 1 to May 31, prevailing time in the covered minor's location.
Section 3. KRS 367.3613 is amended to read as follows:
(1) KRS 367.3611 to 367.3629 applies[apply] to persons that conduct business in the
Commonwealth or produce products or services that are targeted to residents of the
Commonwealth and that during a calendar year control or process personal data of
at least:
(a) One hundred thousand (100,000) consumers; or
Page 16 of 20
XXXX 2/11/2026 7:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 356
(b) Twenty-five thousand (25,000) consumers and derive over fifty percent (50%)
of gross revenue from the sale of personal data.
(2) KRS 367.3611 to 367.3629 shall not apply to any:
(a) City, state agency, or any political subdivision of the state;
(b) Financial institutions, their affiliates, or data subject to Title V of the federal
Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 6801 et seq.;
(c) Covered entity or business associate governed by the privacy, security, and
breach notification rules issued by the United States Department of Health
and Human Services, 45 C.F.R. pts. 160 and 164 established pursuant to
HIPAA;
(d) Nonprofit organization;
(e) Institution of higher education;
(f) Organization that:
1. Does not provide net earnings to, or operate in any manner that inures to
the benefit of, any officer, employee, or shareholder of the entity; and
2. Is an entity such as those recognized under KRS 304.47-060(1)(e), so
long as the entity collects, processes, uses, or shares data solely in
relation to identifying, investigating, or assisting:
a. Law enforcement agencies in connection with suspected
insurance-related criminal or fraudulent acts; or
b. First responders in connection with catastrophic events; or
(g) Small telephone utility as defined in KRS 278.516, a Tier III CMRS provider
as defined in KRS 65.7621, or a municipally owned utility that does not sell
or share personal data with any third-party.
(3) The following information and data are exempt from KRS 367.3611 to 367.3629:
(a) Protected health information under HIPAA;
(b) Health records;
Page 17 of 20
XXXX 2/11/2026 7:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 356
(c) Patient identifying information for purposes of 42 C.F.R. sec. 2.11;
(d) Identifiable private information for purposes of the federal policy for the
protection of human subjects under 45 C.F.R. pt. 46; identifiable private
information that is otherwise information collected as part of human subjects
research pursuant to the good clinical practice guidelines issued by the
International Council for Harmonisation of Technical Requirements for
Pharmaceuticals for Human Use; the protection of human subjects under 21
C.F.R. pts. 50 and 56; or personal data used or shared in research conducted in
accordance with the requirements set forth in KRS 367.3611 to 367.3629, or
other research conducted in accordance with applicable law;
(e) Information and documents created for purposes of the federal Health Care
Quality Improvement Act of 1986, 42 U.S.C. sec. 11101 et seq.;
(f) Patient safety work product for purposes of the federal Patient Safety and
Quality Improvement Act, 42 U.S.C. sec. 299b-21 et seq.;
(g) Information derived from any of the health care-related information listed in
this subsection that is de-identified in accordance with the requirements for
de-identification pursuant to HIPAA;
(h) Information originating from, and intermingled to be indistinguishable from,
or information treated in the same manner as information exempt under this
subsection that is maintained by a covered entity or business associate, or a
program or qualified service organization as defined by 42 C.F.R. sec. 2.11;
(i) Information collected by a health care provider who is a covered entity that
maintains protected health information in accordance with HIPAA and related
regulations, 45 C.F.R. sec. pts. 160, 162, and 164;
(j) Information included in a limited data set as described in 45 C.F.R. sec.
164.514(e), to the extent the information is used, disclosed, and maintained as
specified in 45 C.F.R. sec. 164.514(e);
Page 18 of 20
XXXX 2/11/2026 7:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 356
(k) Information used only for public health activities and purposes as authorized
by HIPAA;
(l) The collection, maintenance, disclosure, sale, communication, or use of any
personal information bearing on a consumer's creditworthiness, credit
standing, credit capacity, character, general reputation, personal
characteristics, or mode of living by a consumer reporting agency, furnisher,
or other person[user] that provides information for use in a consumer report,
and by a person using[user of] a consumer report, but only to the extent that
such activity is regulated by and authorized under the federal Fair Credit
Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 1681 et seq.;
(m) Personal data collected, processed, sold, or disclosed in compliance with the
federal Driver's Privacy Protection Act of 1994, 18 U.S.C. sec. 2721 et seq.;
(n) Personal data regulated by the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy
Act, 20 U.S.C. sec. 1232g et seq.;
(o) Personal data collected, processed, sold, or disclosed in compliance with the
federal Farm Credit Act, 12 U.S.C. sec. 2001 et seq.;
(p) Data processed or maintained:
1. In the course of an individual applying to, employed by, or acting as an
agent or independent contractor of a controller, processor, or third party,
to the extent that the data is collected and used within the context of that
role;
2. As the emergency contact information of an individual used for
emergency contact purposes; or
3. That is necessary to retain to administer benefits for another individual
relating to the individual under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph and
used for the purposes of administering those benefits;
(q) Data processed by a utility, an affiliate of a utility, or a holding company
Page 19 of 20
XXXX 2/11/2026 7:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 356
system organized specifically for the purpose of providing goods or services
to a utility as defined in KRS 278.010. As used in[For purposes of] this
paragraph, "holding company system" means two (2) or more affiliated
persons, one (1) or more of which is a utility; and
(r) Personal data collected and used for purposes of federal policy under the
Combat Methamphetamine Epidemic Act of 2005.
(4) Controllers and processors that comply with the verifiable parental consent
requirements of the Children's Online Privacy Protection Act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 6501
et seq., shall be deemed compliant with any obligation to obtain parental consent
under KRS 367.3611 to 367.3629.
Section 4. Section 2 of this Act may be cited as the Kentucky Kid’s Code.
Page 20 of 20
XXXX 2/11/2026 7:44 PM Jacketed